New York, session 2025-2026, S628.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 240.30 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten or alarm another 4 person, and with no purpose of legitimate communication transmits, 5 sends, or gives unwanted lewd or intimate images to another person; or 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01547-01-5